Hawaii statutes.
§501-216 State, not liable when. The
State shall not be liable to pay for any loss, damage, or deprivation
occasioned by a breach of trust, whether expressed, implied, or constructive,
by any registered owner who is a trustee, or by the improper exercise of any
power of sale in a mortgage. Nor shall any plaintiff prosecuting a contract
claim under this chapter recover as compensation more than the fair market
value of the real estate at the time when the plaintiff suffered the loss,
damage, or deprivation thereof. [L 1903, c 56, §102; RL 1925, §3292; am L 1932
2d, c 33, §5; RL 1935, §5103; RL 1945, §12703; RL 1955, §342-103; HRS §501-216;
am L 1972, c 91, §1(pp); gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next